District of Columbia statutes.
2-1225.13

Continuation of ongoing procurement process.

The Mayor may enter into a contract based upon a solicitation, including a request for proposals, request for qualifications, or request for expressions of interest, issued by the NCRC or the AWC before October 1, 2007.

Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 203, 55 DCR 1689
This section is referenced in § 2-1225.12.